Hawaii statutes.
§431M-4 Mental illness, alcohol and drug
dependence benefits. (a) Alcohol and drug dependence benefits shall be as
follows:

(1) Detoxification services as a covered benefit
under this chapter shall be provided either in a hospital or in a nonhospital facility
that has a written affiliation agreement with a hospital for emergency,
medical, and mental health support services. The following services shall be
covered under detoxification services:

(A) Room and board;

(B) Diagnostic x-rays;

(C) Laboratory testing; and

(D) Drugs, equipment use, special therapies,
and supplies.

Detoxification services shall be included as part
of the covered in-hospital services;

(2) Alcohol or drug dependence treatment through
in-hospital, nonhospital residential, or day treatment substance abuse services
as a covered benefit under this chapter shall be provided in a hospital or
nonhospital facility. Before a person qualifies to receive benefits under this
subsection, a qualified physician, psychologist, licensed clinical social
worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed mental health
counselor, or advanced practice registered nurse shall determine that the
person suffers from alcohol or drug dependence, or both; provided that the
substance abuse services covered under this paragraph shall include those
services that are required for licensure and accreditation. Excluded from
alcohol or drug dependence treatment under this subsection are detoxification
services and educational programs to which drinking or drugged drivers are
referred by the judicial system and services performed by mutual self-help
groups;

(3) Alcohol or drug dependence outpatient services as
a covered benefit under this chapter shall be provided under an individualized
treatment plan approved by a qualified physician, psychologist, licensed
clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed mental
health counselor, or advanced practice registered nurse and shall be services
reasonably expected to produce remission of the patient's condition. An
individualized treatment plan approved by a licensed marriage and family
therapist, licensed mental health counselor, licensed clinical social worker,
or an advanced practice registered nurse for a patient already under the care
or treatment of a physician or psychologist shall be done in consultation with
the physician or psychologist; and

(4) Substance abuse assessments for alcohol or drug
dependence as a covered benefit under this section for a child facing
disciplinary action under section 302A-1134.6 shall be provided by a qualified
physician, psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, advanced practice
registered nurse, or certified substance abuse counselor. The certified
substance abuse counselor shall be employed by a hospital or nonhospital
facility providing substance abuse services. The substance abuse assessment
shall evaluate the suitability for substance abuse treatment and placement in
an appropriate treatment setting.

(b) Mental illness benefits.

(1) Covered benefits for mental health services set forth
in this subsection shall be limited to coverage for diagnosis and treatment of mental
disorders. All mental health services shall be provided under an individualized
treatment plan approved by a physician, psychologist, licensed clinical social worker,
licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed mental health counselor, advanced
practice registered nurse, or licensed dietitian treating eating disorders, and
must be reasonably expected to improve the patient's condition. An
individualized treatment plan approved by a licensed clinical social worker, licensed
marriage and family therapist, licensed mental health counselor, advanced
practice registered nurse, or a licensed dietitian treating eating disorders,
for a patient already under the care or treatment of a physician or psychologist
shall be done in consultation with the physician or psychologist;

(2) In-hospital and nonhospital residential mental health services
as a covered benefit under this chapter shall be provided in a hospital or a nonhospital
residential facility. The services to be covered shall include those services required
for licensure and accreditation;

(3) Mental health partial hospitalization as a covered benefit under
this chapter shall be provided by a hospital or a mental health outpatient facility.
The services to be covered under this paragraph shall include those services required
for licensure and accreditation; and

(4) Mental health outpatient services shall be a covered benefit
under this chapter. [L 1988, c 202, pt of §1, §3; am L 1994, c 111, §§2,
4; am L 1997, c 247, §3 and c 273, §3; am L 1998, c 78, §§2, 3; am L 1999, c
121, §§2, 6; am L 2000, c 243, §8(2); am L 2001, c 111, §3; am L 2002, c 167,
§5 and c 239, §1; am L 2003, c 197, §3; am L 2006, c 205, §3; am L 2007, c 38,
§3; am L 2008, c 206, §4; am L 2014, c 186, §11; am L 2016, c 29, §3 and c 141,
§13]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next